Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-965.01
Advisory committee; membership.

The director shall convene an advisory committee to advise the director concerning his or her responsibilities under the noxious weed control program. Representatives from the Nebraska Weed Control Association, the leafy spurge task force, state or federal agencies actively concerned with the control of noxious weeds, the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources, and cities and villages of this state, persons actively involved in agriculture, and others in the public and private sector may serve on such committee at the request of the director. If an advisory committee is convened, members shall not receive any reimbursement for expenses.

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 15.